District of Columbia statutes.
21-308

Receipt for custodial property.

A written acknowledgement of delivery by a custodian constitutes a sufficient receipt and discharge for custodial property transferred under this act.

History

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-308.

References in Text

“This act”, referred to at the end of the section, is the District of Columbia Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, D.C. Law 6-87 which is codified primarily as § 21-301 et seq.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.